Wyoming, session 2025, SF0160.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 5-12-104(a)(ii), (iii), (v) through
(viii), (xii), (xv) through (xvii), by creating new
paragraphs (xviii) through (xx) and by renumbering (xviii)
as (xxi), 5-12-105(a), (b)(iii), by creating a new
paragraph (iv) and by renumbering (iv) as (v), 5-12-106(b),
5-12-109(b)(intro), (c), (d) and by creating a new
subsection (e), 5-12-110(b)(intro), 5-12-111(a)(intro),
5-12-115(a)(iii), (v) and by creating a new paragraph
(vii), 7-6-104(d) and by creating a new subsection (e),
7-13-1301(a)(v), 7-13-1302, 7-13-1303(a), 7-13-1708(c),
14-6-219(a), 14-6-402(a)(xxii), 14-6-419(a), 31-5-233(e),
31-5-234(e) and 35-7-1033(b)(i), (ii) and (iv) are amended
to read:
5-12-104. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ii) "Applicant" means the one (1) or more
governing body bodies of a city, town or county, a tribal
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
government of either the Northern Arapaho or Eastern
Shoshone tribes of the Wind River Indian Reservation or a
nonprofit organization recognized under 26 U.S.C.
501(c)(3);
(iii) "Continuum of care" means a seamless and
coordinated course of substance abuse use disorder
education and treatment, mental health treatment or any
combination thereof designed to meet the needs of drug
offenders as they move through the criminal justice system
and beyond, maximizing self-sufficiency participants;
(v) "Dual diagnosis" means a substance abuse use
disorder and a co-occurring mental health disorder;
(vi) "Participant" means a person with a mental
illness or a dual diagnosis who committed or is alleged to
have committed an offense, including those who have had law
enforcement contact for such offenses with or without
arrest, or a substance offender or any other person as
provided in title 14 of the Wyoming statutes who has been
referred to and accepted into a program;
(vii) "Participating judge" means the district,
juvenile, circuit, chancery, municipal or tribal court
judge or magistrate or retired district, circuit or
chancery court judge acting as part of a program team;
(viii) "Program" or "court supervised treatment
program" means a one (1) or more local court supervised
treatment program or mental health programs that complies
comply with rules and regulations adopted by the Wyoming
supreme court;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(xii) "Referring judge" means the district,
juvenile, circuit, municipal or tribal court judge or
magistrate who refers a substance offender or any other
person as provided in title 14 of the Wyoming statutes
participant to a program;
(xv) "Substance abuse use disorder assessment"
means as defined in W.S. 7-13-1301(a)(v);
(xvi) "Substance abuse use disorder treatment"
means treatment designed to provide education, and therapy
and medication, as appropriate, directed toward ending a
substance abuse use disorder and preventing its return;
(xvii) "Substance offender" means a person
arrested for, charged with or adjudicated for a substance
related offense or an offense in which substance abuse use
is determined from the evidence to have been a significant
factor in the commission of the offense;
(xviii) "Mental health treatment" means
medication, therapy and prescribed care designed to address
disturbances in behavior, emotions, thoughts or judgment
after an evaluation and mental health diagnosis or
diagnostic impression has occurred;
(xix) For purposes of W.S. 5-12-101 through
5-12-118, "mental illness" means schizophrenia,
schizoaffective disorder, major depressive disorder, post-
traumatic stress disorder or bipolar disorder, as diagnosed
by a mental health professional;
(xx) "Substance use disorder" means as defined
by W.S. 35-1-613(a)(viii);
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(xviii)(xxi) "This act" means W.S. 5-12-101
through 5-12-118.
5-12-105. Purposes and goals.
(a) The legislature recognizes the critical need in
this state for treatment programs to break the cycle of
substance abuse use disorders, unmet mental health needs
and the crimes committed as a result thereof. Court
supervised treatment Programs shall be facilitated for the
purpose of providing sentencing options for the judicial
system in cases stemming from substance abuse, by combining
judicial supervision, probation, substance abuse use
disorder assessment, mental health screening, substance
abuse use disorder testing, monitoring, treatment, and or
aftercare for substance offenders participants.
(b) The goals of the programs funded under this act
shall be:
(iii) To strive for sobriety recovery and mental
wellness of participants; and
(iv) To reduce the number of people with mental
illness in jail, criminal court proceedings and the state
hospital; and
(iv)(v) To monitor the services provided to
participants.
5-12-106. Standards for attorneys and judges.
(b) The Referring judge judges in a particular case
may be the a participating judge in that participant's
treatment program, provided the participating judge shall
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
not act upon any motion to revoke probation that may be
filed in the original criminal or juvenile case, nor in
sentencing or disposition.
5-12-109. Participation in programs; conditions;
extended probation.
(b) Any district, juvenile, circuit, municipal or
tribal court judge, or magistrate, may refer substance
offenders for participation in a participant to a program.
The referring judge may act as a participating judge in a
program as authorized by this act and by rules adopted by
the supreme court. A substance offender who is a defendant
in a criminal action or a respondent in a juvenile court
action may be referred for participation in a program if:
(c) Referral and participation in a program shall
only be with the and consent of the referring judge and the
participant, and acceptance of the participant by the
program team to participate shall be governed by the rules
adopted by the supreme court and title 14 for juvenile
participants. Consent shall also be in accordance with a
written agreement between the participant and the program
team. The agreement shall include the participant's consent
to release of medical and other records relevant to his
treatment history and assessment that meets the
requirements of 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2(b) or 42 C.F.R. part
2.31, as applicable. Prior to a participant's entry into a
written agreement, the participating judge participant
shall inform the participant be informed that he may be
subject to a term of probation that exceeds the maximum
term of imprisonment established for the particular offense
charged, as provided in W.S. 5-9-134 and 5-12-116.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(d) Nothing in this act shall confer a right or an
expectation of a right to participate in a program, nor
does this act obligate a program team to accept any
proposed participant. Neither the establishment of a
program nor anything herein contained shall be construed as
limiting the discretion of a prosecuting attorney in regard
to the prosecution of any criminal or juvenile case.
Consent to participation in a program under subsection (c)
of this section shall only be required from the referring
judge and participant.
(e) A program may accept participants from any other
jurisdiction in the state.
5-12-110. Incentives and sanctions; extended
probation.
(b) The participating judge may impose reasonable
sanctions under the written agreement, including but not
limited to, expulsion from the program, incarceration for a
period not to exceed thirty (30) days if the participant is
an adult participating in a program post-adjudication, or
detention for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days if
the participant is a juvenile participating in a program
post-adjudication, if the participating judge finds that
since the last staffing the participant:
5-12-111. Program team to be created; duties; program
coordinator.
(a) Each applicant seeking to establish a program
shall create a program team, consisting of the following
members, all of whom shall be appointed by the governing
body of the applicant, subject to the individual consent of
each appointee:
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
5-12-115. Participant information and progress
statistics.
(a) Participants may be required to provide access to
the following information, the collection and maintenance
of which by the program team shall be in a standardized
format pursuant to rules and regulations of the supreme
court:
(iii) Substance abuse use disorder history,
including substances of choice medical records and prior
treatment;
(v) Number and health of children born to female
participants;
(vii) Mental illness history, including medical
records and prior treatment.
7-6-104. Representation of needy persons.
(d) A needy person's right to a benefit under
subsection (a), or (c) or (e) of this section is not
affected by his having provided a similar benefit at his
own expense, or by his having waived it, at an earlier
stage.
(e) The public defender shall be authorized to serve
on court supervised treatment program teams pursuant to
W.S. 5-12-101 through 5-12-118 and may represent
participants in court supervised treatment program
proceedings, including sanction and expulsion proceedings.
7-13-1301. Definitions.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) As used in W.S. 7-13-1301 through 7-13-1304:
(v) "Substance abuse use disorder assessment"
means an evaluation conducted by a qualified person using
practices and procedures approved by the department of
health to determine whether a person has a need for alcohol
or other drug treatment and the level of treatment services
required to treat that person;
7-13-1302. Substance use disorder assessment
required.
All persons convicted of a third misdemeanor under W.S.
31-5-233(e) or a felony shall receive a substance abuse use
disorder assessment. The substance abuse use disorder
assessment shall be part of a presentence report if
prepared. The cost of the substance abuse use disorder
assessment shall be assessed to and paid by the offender. A
person who has undergone a substance abuse use disorder
assessment pursuant to W.S. 31-5-233(e) may receive a
second assessment under this section if the court finds
that enough time has passed to make the first assessment
inaccurate.
7-13-1303. Suspended sentence for qualified
offenders.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, notwithstanding any other provision of law,
qualified offenders may be placed on probation under W.S.
7-13-301, receive a suspended sentence under W.S.
7-13-302(a) or placed on probation under W.S. 35-7-1037.
The sentence or probation order shall set forth the terms
of a treatment program based upon the substance abuse use
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
disorder assessment and any other terms and conditions as
the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances, and
require the offender to satisfactorily complete the
treatment program. The court shall include in the sentence
or probation order any provisions necessary to reasonably
protect the health of the offender.
7-13-1708. Authority of court to order participation
in program.
(c) Before ordering participation in the program, a
court may require the person to undergo a substance abuse
use disorder assessment. The cost of the substance abuse
use disorder assessment shall be paid by the offender.
14-6-219. Physical and mental examinations;
involuntary commitment of incompetents; subsequent
proceedings.
(a) Any time after the filing of a petition, on
motion of the district attorney or the child's parents,
guardian, custodian or attorney or on motion of the court,
the court may order the child to be examined by a licensed
and qualified physician, surgeon, psychiatrist or
psychologist designated by the court to aid in determining
the physical and mental condition of the child. The
examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis, but
the court may commit the child to a suitable medical
facility or institution for examination if deemed
necessary. Commitment for examination shall not exceed
fifteen (15) days. Any time after the filing of a petition,
the court on its own motion or motion of the district
attorney or the child's parents, guardian, custodian or
attorney, may order the child's parents, guardians or other
custodial members of the child's family to undergo a
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
substance abuse use disorder assessment at the expense of
the child's parents, guardians or other custodial members
of the child's family and to fully comply with all findings
and recommendations set forth in the assessment. Failure to
comply may result in contempt proceedings as set forth in
W.S. 14-6-242.
14-6-402. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xxii) "Substance abuse use disorder assessment"
means an evaluation conducted by a qualified person using
practices and procedures approved by the department of
health to determine whether a person has a need for alcohol
or other drug treatment and the level of treatment services
required to treat that person;
14-6-419. Physical and mental examinations.
(a) Any time after the filing of a petition, on
motion of the district attorney or the child's parents,
guardian, custodian or attorney or on motion of the court,
the court may order the child to be examined by a licensed
and qualified physician, surgeon, psychiatrist,
psychologist or licensed mental health professional
designated by the court to aid in determining the physical
and mental condition of the child. The examination shall be
conducted on an outpatient basis, but the court may commit
the child to a suitable medical facility or institution for
examination if deemed necessary. Commitment for examination
shall not exceed fifteen (15) days. Any time after the
filing of a petition, the court on its own motion or on
motion of the district attorney or the child's parents,
guardian, custodian or attorney, may order the child's
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
parents, guardians or other custodial members of the
child's family to undergo a substance abuse use disorder
assessment at the expense of the child's parents, guardians
or other custodial members of the child's family and to
fully comply with all findings and recommendations set
forth in the assessment. Failure to comply may result in
contempt proceedings as set forth in W.S. 14-6-438.
31-5-233. Driving or having control of vehicle while
under influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled
substances; penalties.
(e) Except as otherwise provided, a person convicted
of violating this section shall be ordered to or shall
receive a substance abuse use disorder assessment conducted
by a substance abuse use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) at or
before sentencing. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this subsection, a nonresident may receive a substance
abuse use disorder assessment from a provider certified by
that person's state of residence. The cost of the substance
abuse use disorder assessment shall be assessed to and paid
by the offender. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection or subsection (h) or (m) of this section, a
person convicted of violating this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or both. On a second offense resulting
in a conviction within ten (10) years after a conviction
for a violation of this section or other law prohibiting
driving while under the influence, he shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than seven (7) days nor more than
six (6) months, he shall be ordered to or shall receive a
substance abuse use disorder assessment conducted by a
substance abuse use disorder provider certified by the
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before
sentencing and shall not be eligible for probation or
suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until
he has served at least seven (7) days in jail. In
addition, the person may be fined not less than two hundred
dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00). On a third offense resulting in a conviction
within ten (10) years after a conviction for a violation of
this section or other law prohibiting driving while under
the influence, he shall be punished by imprisonment for not
less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months,
shall receive a substance abuse use disorder assessment
pursuant to W.S. 7-13-1302 and shall not be eligible for
probation or suspension of sentence or release on any other
basis until he has served at least thirty (30) days in jail
except that the court shall consider the substance abuse
use disorder assessment and may order the person to undergo
outpatient alcohol or substance abuse use disorder
treatment during any mandatory period of incarceration. The
minimum period of imprisonment for a third violation shall
be mandatory, but the court, having considered the
substance abuse use disorder assessment and the
availability of public and private resources, may suspend
up to fifteen (15) days of the mandatory period of
imprisonment if, subsequent to the date of the current
violation, the offender completes an inpatient treatment
program approved by the court. In addition, the person may
be fined not less than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00).
The judge may suspend part or all of the discretionary
portion of an imprisonment sentence under this subsection
and place the defendant on probation on condition that the
defendant pursues and completes an alcohol education or
treatment program as prescribed by the judge.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term of
12

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
probation imposed by a judge under this section may exceed
the maximum term of imprisonment established for the
offense under this subsection provided the term of
probation together with any extension thereof, shall not
exceed three (3) years for up to and including a third
conviction. On a fourth offense resulting in a conviction
or subsequent conviction within ten (10) years for a
violation of this section or other law prohibiting driving
while under the influence, he shall be guilty of a felony
and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00),
punished by imprisonment for not more than seven (7) years,
or both.
31-5-234. Unlawful operation of vehicle by youthful
driver with detectable alcohol concentration; penalty.
(e) A person convicted of violating this section
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). A
person convicted of violating this section a second time
within one (1) year of the first conviction is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
one (1) month, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or both. A person convicted of a third
or subsequent conviction under this section within two (2)
years shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or
both. The court may order the person to undergo a substance
abuse use disorder assessment and complete any recommended
treatment for any conviction under this section as a
condition of probation. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, the term of probation imposed by a judge under this
section may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment
established for the offense under this subsection provided
13

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the term of probation together with any extension thereof,
shall in no case exceed three (3) years.
35-7-1033. Unlawful acts; distribution; registration;
possession; records; counterfeiting; punishment.
(b) Except for a violation of subparagraph
(a)(iii)(B) of this section and except as otherwise
provided:
(i) A person who is convicted upon a plea of
guilty or no contest or found guilty of violating paragraph
(a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both, and the person may be ordered to
receive a substance abuse use disorder assessment conducted
by a substance abuse use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before
sentencing;
(ii) A person convicted upon a plea of guilty or
no contest or found guilty of a second offense of violating
paragraph (a)(iii) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars
($1,000.00), or both, and the person shall be ordered to
receive a substance abuse use disorder assessment conducted
by a substance abuse use disorder provider certified by the
department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2701(c) before
sentencing;
(iv) In the event a substance abuse use disorder
assessment ordered pursuant to this section is provided by
an entity with whom the department of health contracts for
14

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
treatment services, the costs of the assessment shall be
paid by the offender subject to the payment policies
adopted pursuant to W.S. 35-1-620; provided however, if the
assessment is ordered as a result of a felony conviction
under this section, the assessment shall be conducted and
costs assessed pursuant to W.S. 7-13-1301, et seq.;
Section 2. W.S. 5-12-107(c)(ii) and 5-12-109(a) and
(b)(i) through (iv) are repealed.
Section 3. The supreme court may promulgate
additional rules necessary to implement this act. It is the
intent of the legislature that the supreme court make any
necessary requests to support court supervised treatment
programs as provided by this act in its biennial budget
request.
15

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0160
ENROLLED ACT NO. 90, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
16